Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 2
ADMINISTRATION

32-11-201. Creation of district.

There is hereby created a district to be known and designated as the "Urban Drainage and Flood Control District".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 743, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-5.

32-11-202. Boundaries of district.

The area comprising the district consists of the lands located in the city and county of Denver, in the city and county of Broomfield, and in the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, and Jefferson within the boundaries of the district, described as follows:

Beginning at the southwest corner of Section 26, T.2 N., R.71 W.; thence easterly along the south line of Section 26, T.2 N., R.71 W. and along the south line of Section 25, T.2 N., R.71 W., a distance of 2 miles to the southeast corner of said Section 25, T.2 N., R.71 W., being the northwest corner of Section 31, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence southerly along the west line of said Section 31, T.2 N., R.70 W., a distance of 1 mile, more or less, to the southwest corner of said Section 31, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence easterly, along the south line of said Section 31, T.2 N., R.70 W., and along the south line of Sections 32, 33, and 34 of T.2 N., R.70 W., a distance of 4 miles, more or less, to the southeast corner of said Section 34, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence northerly along the east line of said Section 34, T.2 N., R.70 W., a distance of 0.5 miles, more or less, to the east 1/4 corner of said Section 34, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence easterly along the center section line of Section 35, T.2 N., R.70 W., a distance of 1.0 mile, more or less, to the east 1/4 corner of said Section 35, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence southerly along the east line of said Section 35, T.2 N., R.70 W., a distance of 0.5 miles, more or less, to the southeast corner of said Section 35, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence easterly along the south line of Section 36, T.2 N., R.70 W., a distance of 1 mile, more or less, to the southeast corner of said Section 36, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence northerly along the east line of said Section 36, T.2 N., R.70 W., a distance of 0.5 miles, more or less, to the east 1/4 corner of said Section 36, T.2 N., R.70 W.; thence easterly along the center section line of Section 31, T.2 N., R.69 W., a distance of 1 mile, more or less, to the east 1/4 corner of said Section 31, T.2 N., R.69 W.; thence northerly along the east line of said Section 31, T.2 N., R.69 W., a distance of 0.5 miles, more or less, to the northeast corner of said Section 31, T.2 N., R.69 W.; thence easterly along the south line of Sections 29 and 28, T.2 N., R.69 W., and along a portion of the south line of Section 27, T.2 N., R.69 W., a distance of 2.5 miles, more or less, to the south 1/4 corner of said Section 27, T.2 N., R.69 W.; thence northerly along the center section line of Section 27, T.2 N., R.69 W., and along the center section line of Section 22, T.2 N., R.69 W., a distance of 2 miles, more or less, to the north 1/4 corner of said Section 22, T.2 N., R.69 W.; thence easterly along the north line of said Section 22, T.2 N., R.69 W., and along the north line of Sections 23 and 24, T.2 N., R.69 W., a distance of 2.5 miles, more or less, to the northeast corner of Section 24, T.2 N., R.69 W.; thence southerly along the east line of Sections 24, 25, and 36 of T.2 N., R.69 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 1, 12, 13, 24, 25, and 36 of T.1 N., R.69 W., a distance of 9 miles, more or less, to the southeast corner of said Section 36, T.1 N., R.69 W., said corner being also the southwest corner of Section 31, T.1 N., R.68 W.; thence easterly along the south line of said Section 31, T.1 N., R.68 W., and along the south line of Sections 32, 33, 34, 35, and 36 of T.1 N., R.68 W., and continuing easterly along the south line of Sections 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, and 36 of T.1 N., R.67 W., and continuing easterly along the south line of Sections 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, and 36 of T.1 N., R.66 W., and continuing easterly along the south line of Sections 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, and 36 of T.1 N., R.65 W., and continuing easterly along the south line of Sections 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, and 36 of T.1 N., R.64 W., a distance of 30 miles, more or less, to the southeast corner of said Section 36, T.1 N., R.64 W., said corner being also the northeast corner of Section 1, T.1 S., R.64 W.; thence southerly along the east line of Section 1, T.1 S., R.64 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 12, 13, 24, 25, and 36 of T.1 S., R.64 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 1, 12, 13, 24, 25 and 36 of T.2 S., R.64 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 1, 12, 13, 24, 25, and 36 of T.3 S., R.64 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 1, 12, 13, 24, 25, and 36 of T.4 S., R.64 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 1, 12, 13, 24, 25, and 36 of T.5 S., R.64 W., a distance of 30 miles, more or less, to the southeast corner of Section 36, T.5 S., R.64 W.; thence westerly along the south line of said Section 36, T.5 S., R.64 W., and continuing westerly along the south line of Sections 35, 34, 33, 32, and 31, T.5 S., R.64 W., and continuing westerly along the south line of Sections 36, 35, and 34, T.5 S., R.65 W., a distance of 9 miles, more or less, to the southwest corner of Section 34, T.5 S., R.65 W., said corner being also the northeast corner of Section 4, T.6 S., R.65 W.; thence southerly along the east line of said Section 4, T.6 S., R.65 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 9, 16, 21, 28, and 33, T.6 S., R.65 W., and continuing southerly along the east line of Sections 4, 9, and 16, T.7 S., R.65 W., a distance of 9 miles, more or less, to the southeast corner of Section 16, T.7 S., R.65 W.; thence westerly along the south line of Section 16 and along the south line of Sections 17 and 18, T.7 S., R.65 W., and continuing westerly along the south line of Sections 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, and 18, T.7 S., R.66 W., and continuing westerly along the south line of Sections 13, 14, 15, 16, and 17, T.7 S., R.67 W., a distance of 14 miles, more or less, to the southwest corner of Section 17, T.7 S., R.67 W., said corner also being the northeast corner of Section 19, T.7 S., R.67 W.; thence southerly along the east line of Section 19, T.7 S., R.67 W., and continuing south along the east line of Section 30, T.7 S., R.67 W., a distance of 2 miles, more or less, to the southeast corner of Section 30, T.7 S., R.67 W.; thence westerly along the south line of Section 30, T.7 S., R.67 W., and continuing westerly along the south line of Sections 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, and 30, T.7 S., R.68 W., and continuing along the south line of Sections 25 and 26, T.7 S., R.69 W., a distance of 9 miles, more or less, to the southwest corner of Section 26, T.7 S., R.69 W.; thence northerly along the west line of said Section 26, and along the west line of Sections 23, 14, 11, and 2, T.7 S., R.69 W., a distance of 5 miles, more or less, to the northwest corner of Section 2, T.7 S., R.69 W., said corner being also the northeast corner of Section 3, T.7 S., R.69 W.; thence westerly along the north line of said Section 3 and along the north line of Sections 4, 5, and 6, T.7 S., R.69 W., and continuing westerly along the north line of Section 1, T.7 S., R.70 W., a distance of 5 miles, more or less, to the northwest corner of Section 1, T.7 S., R.70 W., said corner being also the southwest corner of Section 36, T.6 S., R.70 W.; thence northerly along the west line of said Section 36 and along the west line of Sections 25, 24, 13, 12, and 1 of T.6 S., R.70 W., and continuing easterly along the north line of said Section 1 to the southwest corner of Section 36, T.5 S., R.70 W., and along the west line of Sections 36 and 25, T.5 S., R.70 W., a distance of 8 miles, more or less, to the northwest corner of Section 25, T.5 S., R.70 W., said corner being also the northeast corner of Section 26, T.5 S., R.70 W.; thence westerly along the north line of said Section 26, and westerly along the north line of Sections 27, 28, 29, and 30, a distance of 5 miles, more or less, to the northwest corner of Section 30, T.5 S., R.70 W., said corner being also the southwest corner of Section 19, T.5 S., R.70 W.; thence northerly along the west line of said Section 19, and along the west line of Sections 18, 7, and 6 of T.5 S., R.70 W., and along the west line of Sections 31, 30, 19, 18, 7, and 6 of T.4 S., R.70 W., and continuing northerly along the west line of Sections 31, 30, 19, 18, 7, and 6 of T.3 S., R.70 W., and continuing northerly along the west line of Sections 31, 30, 19, 18, 7, and 6 of T.2 S., R.70 W., and continuing northerly along the west line of Sections 31 and 30 of T.1 S., R.70 W., a distance of 24 miles, more or less, to the northwest corner of Section 30, T.1 S., R.70 W., said corner being also the southeast corner of Section 24, T.1 S., R.71 W.; thence westerly along the south line of said Section 24 and along the south line of Section 23, a distance of 2.5 miles, more or less, to the southwest corner of Section 23, T.1 S., R.71 W.; thence northerly along the west line of said Section 23 and along the west line of Sections 14, 11, and 2 of T.1 S., R.71 W., and continuing easterly along the south line of Section 34 to the southwest corner of Section 35 of T.1 N., R.71 W., and continuing northerly along the west line of Sections 35, 26, 23, 14, 11, and 2 of T.1 N., R.71 W., and continuing northerly along the west line of Section 35, T.2 N., R.71 W., a distance of 11 miles, more or less, to the southwest corner of Section 26, T.2 N., R.71 W., said corner being the point of beginning; and the described area containing 1208 sections, more or less.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 743, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-6.

L. 71:

p. 983, § 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1322, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2001:

IP amended, p. 266, § 6, effective November 15.

32-11-203. Board of directors.

All powers, rights, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon the urban district shall be exercised and performed by and through a local legislative body designated as the board of directors.

The board of directors of the district may create an executive committee of the board and may delegate and redelegate to such committee such power to act on behalf of the district as the board may determine by resolution.

The exercise of all executive, administrative, and ministerial powers may be delegated and redelegated by the board to officials and employees of the district.

Repealed.

Except for the initial appointments of directors, or for any director chosen to fill any unexpired term, and except as otherwise provided in section 32-11-204 (1) and (5.5), the term of each director shall commence on February 1 of a designated year as provided in this article and shall be for two years.

Each director shall be chosen to serve such a two-year term ending on the last day of January of such a year; and each director whose term so ends and otherwise remains qualified to serve as a director shall serve until his successor has been duly chosen and qualified.

Each director, before entering upon the director's official duties, shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation before an officer authorized to administer oaths that he or she will support the constitution of the United States and the constitution and laws of the state, and that he or she will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of his or her office to the best of his or her ability, which oath or affirmation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

The board of directors shall institute and maintain a systematic and uniform program of preventive maintenance in the district, which program shall be administered by said board of directors and not by local governments.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 745, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-7.

L. 79:

(6) added, p. 1210, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(5)(a) amended, p. 1325, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 2001:

(4) amended, p. 266, § 7, effective November 15.

L. 2019:

(4) repealed and (5)(c) added, (HB 19-1284), ch. 332, p. 3073, § 1, effective August 2.

32-11-204. Regular appointments.

The mayor of the city and county of Denver or the deputy mayor shall be ex officio a director.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the other directors shall be chosen as provided in this section.

Two directors shall be appointed to the board by the city council of the city and county of Denver after the second Tuesday in January in each odd-numbered year and by the twentieth day of January in such year. One director shall be appointed to the board by such city council during such part of January in each even-numbered year.

Each director appointed pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be a member of such city council and shall remain as such during his term of office as director.

A director shall be appointed to the board by the board of county commissioners of each of the counties of Adams and Boulder and by the city council of the city and county of Broomfield after the second Tuesday in January in each odd-numbered year and by the twentieth day of January in such year; except that, in 2001, the city council of the city and county of Broomfield shall appoint a director after November 15, 2001. A director shall be appointed to the board by the board of county commissioners of each of the counties of Arapahoe, Douglas, and Jefferson during such part of January in each even-numbered year.

Each director appointed pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be a member of the board of county commissioners appointing him to be a director and shall remain as such during his term of office as director.

A director shall be appointed to the board by the governor from each of the counties of Arapahoe, Douglas, and Jefferson after the second Tuesday in January in each odd-numbered year and by the twentieth day of January in such year. A director shall be appointed to the board by the governor from each of the counties of Adams and Boulder during such part of January in each even-numbered year.

Each director appointed pursuant to this subsection (5) shall be an executive officer of a municipality with a population of one hundred thousand or less, as determined by the latest Denver regional council of governments' estimate, which is located wholly or in part in the county from which he is appointed, shall be a resident of such county, and shall remain as such an executive officer and such a county resident during his term of office as director.

(5.5) The mayor or the mayor pro tem of any city located within the district and having a population in excess of one hundred thousand, as determined by the latest Denver regional council of governments' estimate, shall be ex officio a director.

On or after the twenty-first day of January of each year but on or before the last day of January in such year, a director shall be appointed to the board by such board, including as members thereof for the purposes of this subsection (6) each director newly appointed in such month to the board as provided in subsections (3) to (5) of this section, and including each incumbent director whose regular term of office does not end on the last day of such month, but excluding each incumbent director whose regular term of office ends on the last day of such month.

Each director appointed pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be a professional engineer licensed by the state, an elector of the district, and not an officer in the regular employment of any public body. Each such director shall remain so qualified during his or her term of office as director.

No director appointed pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be deemed to be in the regular employment of such a public body designated in paragraph (b) of this subsection (6) merely because the director or an engineering firm of which he is a member or with which he is otherwise associated is engaged as an independent contractor by the public body.

For the purposes of this subsection (6), a quorum of the board shall constitute a majority of the body composed of the mayor of the city and county of Denver or the deputy mayor and such other directors authorized to appoint such remaining director as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6). Each such appointment shall be by motion adopted by a majority of such directors, including the mayor or the deputy mayor, constituting a quorum.

The secretary of the board shall give at least five days' mailed notice of a special or regular meeting designated by the board for considering each such appointment. Such notice shall be addressed to each such director authorized to make such a remaining appointment at the mailing address designated by him in the records of the district.

Each appointing authority designated in subsections (3) to (6) of this section shall cause each newly appointed director, each other appointing authority, the mayor of the city and county of Denver or the deputy mayor, and the secretary of the board to be notified forthwith of each such appointment.

If any appointing authority designated in subsections (3) to (6) of this section fails to appoint any director to the board as therein provided and to cause notification of such appointment to be given pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, at the time, subject to the limitations, and otherwise as provided in said subsections (3) to (6), the governor forthwith shall make such appointment and shall cause notice thereof to be given as provided in said subsections (3) to (6) for the appointing authority.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any incumbent may be reappointed as a director to the board.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 745, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-8.

L. 70:

p. 298, § 116.

L. 81:

(1), (6)(d), and (7) amended, p. 1648, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 89:

(5)(b) amended and (5.5) added, p. 1325, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 2001:

(4)(a) amended, p. 267, § 8, effective November 15.

L. 2004:

(6)(b) amended, p. 1314, § 65, effective May 28.

L. 2022:

(5)(a) amended, (SB 22-015), ch. 18, p. 132, § 1, effective August 10.

32-11-205. Filling vacancies.

Upon a vacancy occurring in the board by reason of a director's death, resignation, termination of office as a city council member, county commissioner, or executive officer, or failure to remain a professional engineer licensed by the state who is an elector of the district, and is not an officer or in the regular employment of any public body, as the case may be, in contravention of any provision in section 32-11-204 (3) to (6), or for any other reason, the vacancy for the unexpired term of office of such director, upon the creation of such vacancy, shall be filled by the authority appointing him or her by the appointment forthwith of a successor director to serve for such unexpired term in the manner provided for such appointing authority in section 32-11-204 for regular appointments, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 748, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-10.

L. 70:

p. 298, § 117.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1314, § 66, effective May 28.

32-11-206. Organizational meetings. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 748, § 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-11.

L. 2019:

Entire section repealed, (HB 19-1284), ch. 332, p. 3073, § 2, effective August 2.

32-11-207. Fidelity bonds.

Each director shall, before entering upon his official duties, give a fidelity bond to the district in the sum of ten thousand dollars with good and sufficient surety to be approved by the governor, conditioned for the faithful performance of all of the duties of his office, without fraud, deceit, or oppression, and conditioned for the accounting for all moneys and property coming into his hands, and the prompt and faithful payment of all moneys and the delivery of all property coming into his custody or control belonging to the district to his successors in office.

Premiums on all fidelity bonds provided for in this section shall be paid by the district, and all such bonds shall be kept on file in the office of the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 748, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-12.

32-11-208. Board's administrative powers.

The board, on behalf and in the name of the district, has the following powers:

To fix the time and place at which its regular meetings shall be held within the district and to provide for the calling and holding of special meetings;

To adopt and amend or otherwise modify bylaws and rules of procedure;

To select one director as chairman of the board and of the district and another director as chairman pro tem of the board and of the district, and to choose a secretary and a treasurer of the board and of the district, each of which two positions may be filled by a person who is, or is not, a director, and both of which positions may be filled by one person;

To prescribe by resolution a system of business administration, and to create all necessary offices, and to establish and reestablish the powers, duties, and compensation of all officers, agents, and employees and other persons contracting with the district subject to the provisions of section 32-11-212; but, except as may be otherwise therein provided, such compensation shall be established at prevailing rates of pay for equivalent services.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 748, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-13.

32-11-209. Additional administrative powers.

The board also has the following powers for the district:

To require and fix the amount of all official fidelity and completion bonds as may be necessary in the opinion of the board for the protection of the funds and property of the district, subject to the provisions of section 32-11-207;

To prescribe a method of auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands, except as provided in section 32-11-801 and elsewhere in this article;

To provide a method for the letting of contracts on a fair and competitive basis for the construction of works, the facilities, or any project, or any interest therein, or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies as required in this article and to require a contractor's bond in the manner required of a school board and a school district in sections 38-26-101 and 38-26-105 to 38-26-107, C.R.S., as from time to time amended;

To designate an official newspaper published in the district and to publish any notice or other instrument in any additional newspaper when the board deems it necessary to do so;

To make and pass resolutions and orders on behalf of the district, not repugnant to the provisions of this article, necessary or proper for the government and management of the affairs of the district, for the execution of the powers vested in the district, and for carrying into effect the provisions of this article;

To appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district for purposes of depositing such moneys in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 749, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-14.

L. 77:

(1)(c) amended, p. 288, § 62, effective June 29.

L. 79:

(1)(f) added, p. 1626, § 44, effective June 8.

32-11-210. Records of board.

On all resolutions and orders, the roll shall be called, and the ayes and noes shall be recorded. All resolutions and orders, as soon as may be after their passage, shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose and be authenticated by the signature of the presiding officer of the board and the secretary.

Every legislative act of the board of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution.

The book of resolutions and orders shall be a public record. A record shall also be made of all other proceedings of the board, minutes of the meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by officers, employees, and any other agents of the district, and all corporate acts, which record shall also be a public record.

The treasurer shall keep strict and accurate accounts of all moneys received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district in a permanent record, which also shall be a public record.

Any permanent record of the district shall be open for inspection by any elector thereof, by any other interested person, or by any representative of the federal government or any public body.

All records are subject to audit as provided by law for political subdivisions of the state.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 749, § 15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-15.

Cross references:

For the local government audit law, see part 6 of article 1 of title 29.

32-11-211. Meetings of board.

All meetings of the board shall be held within the district and shall be open to the public.

No business of the board shall be transacted except at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the total membership of the board is present.

Any action of the board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present and voting except as otherwise provided in this article.

A smaller number of directors than a quorum may adjourn from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as the board may provide.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 749, § 16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-16.

32-11-212. Compensation of directors.

For directors serving a term of office commencing prior to January 1, 2019, each director shall receive as compensation for the director's services a sum, not in excess of one thousand two hundred dollars per annum, which shall be set by the board on a regular or special meeting basis and which shall not exceed seventy-five dollars per meeting. A director shall not be compensated for any meeting that the director fails to attend.
(1) (a) (I) For directors serving a term of office commencing prior to January 1, 2019, each director shall receive as compensation for the director's services a sum, not in excess of one thousand two hundred dollars per annum, which shall be set by the board on a regular or special meeting basis and which shall not exceed seventy-five dollars per meeting. A director shall not be compensated for any meeting that the director fails to attend.

For directors serving a term of office commencing on or after January 1, 2019, each director shall receive as compensation for the director's services a sum, not in excess of the sums set forth in section 32-1-902 (3)(a)(II). A director shall not be compensated for any meeting that the director fails to attend.

For the purposes of this subsection (1), attendance by an alternate, when authorized in this article, shall be considered as attendance by the director.

If an alternate attends a meeting on behalf of a director, the alternate shall receive compensation not less than that established for directors.

No director shall receive any compensation as an officer, engineer, attorney, employee, or other agent of the district.

The board may authorize the reimbursement of any director for expenses incurred and pertaining to the activities of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 750, § 17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-17.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1649, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 549, § 3, effective April 24.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 19-1213), ch. 135, p. 611, § 1, effective August 2.

32-11-213. Conflicts in interest prohibited.

No director, officer, employee, or agent of the district shall be interested in any contract or transaction with the district, except in his official representative capacity or as is provided in his contract of employment with the district, subject to the provisions of section 32-11-212.

Neither the holding of any office or employment in the government of any public body or of the federal government nor the owning of any property within the state, within or without the district, shall be deemed a disqualification for membership on the board or employment by the district or a disqualification for compensation for services as a director or as an officer, employee, or agent of the district, except as provided in section 32-11-212 and elsewhere in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 750, § 18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-18.

32-11-214. Authorization of facilities.

The district, acting by and through the board, may acquire, improve, equip, relocate, maintain, and operate the facilities, any project, or any part thereof for the benefit of the district and the inhabitants thereof, after the board has made such preliminary studies and otherwise taken such action as it determines to be necessary or desirable as preliminaries thereto.

When a comprehensive program for the acquisition of facilities for the district satisfactory to the board is available, such program shall be tentatively adopted. The program need only describe the proposed facilities in general terms and not in detail.

A public hearing on the proposed program shall be scheduled, and notice of the hearing shall be given by publication. After the hearing and any adjournments thereof which may be ordered, the board may either require changes to be made in the program as the board considers desirable, or the board may approve the program as prepared.

If any substantial changes to the comprehensive program are ordered at any time, in the original acquisition of the facilities or in any improvement thereto, or otherwise, a further hearing shall be held pursuant to notice which shall be given by publication.

Such a comprehensive program may consist of one project or of more than one project. A public hearing need not be held on each such project if it implements such a comprehensive program on which a public hearing has been held.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 750, § 19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-19.

32-11-215. Implementing powers.

The board, in connection with the facilities of the district and any project, may from time to time condemn, otherwise acquire, improve, equip, operate, maintain, and dispose of property within or without or both within and without the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 751, § 20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-20.

32-11-216. Additional powers of district.

The district has the following powers:

To have duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities pertaining to a body corporate and politic and constituting a municipal corporation and political subdivision of the state established as an instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental and proprietary functions to provide for the public health, safety, and general welfare; but, the district shall not have the power to construct, condemn, purchase, acquire, lease, add to, maintain, or conduct and operate a water works to provide domestic, municipal, and industrial water to urban areas;

To have perpetual existence and succession;

To adopt, have, and use a corporate seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

To sue and to be sued and to be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To commence, maintain, intervene in, defend, compromise, terminate by settlement or otherwise, and otherwise participate in and assume the cost and expense of any and all actions and proceedings begun and pertaining to the district, its board, its officers, agents, or employees or any of the district's powers, duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities and disabilities, the facilities or any project of the district, or any property of the district;

To enter into contracts and agreements, including but not limited to contracts with the federal government, the state, and any other public body;

To trade, exchange, purchase, condemn, and otherwise acquire, operate, maintain, and dispose of real property and personal property, including interests therein, either within or without or both within and without the territorial limits of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 751, § 21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-21.

32-11-217. Financial powers of district.

The district also has the following powers:

To borrow money and to issue district securities evidencing any loan to or amount due by the district, to provide for and secure the payment of any district securities and the rights of the holders thereof, and to purchase, hold, and dispose of district securities, as provided in this article;

To fund or refund any loan or obligation of the district, and to issue funding or refunding securities to evidence such loan or obligation without any election, except as provided in this article;

To levy and cause to be collected taxes on and against all taxable property within the district; except that any levy, except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), in excess of one mill shall require the favorable vote of a majority of the electors of the district voting on the question, subject to the limitations provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1), by certifying, in accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., in each year in which the board determines to levy taxes, to the body having authority to levy taxes within each county wherein the district has any territory, the rate so fixed, with directions that, at the time and in the manner required by law for levying taxes for other purposes, such body having authority to levy taxes shall levy such taxes upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such body, as provided in this section. Not more than one-tenth of a mill shall be used for engineering and operations of the district, not more than four-tenths of a mill shall be used for capital construction, and not more than four-tenths of a mill shall be used for maintenance and preservation of floodways and floodplains.

No levy authorized by this article for the payment of the principal of, any prior redemption premiums due in connection with, or the interest on any bonds or other securities issued under this article, whether general obligations or special obligations, shall be subject to the election requirements of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), but all such levies shall be subject to the limitations provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1).

(I.5) In addition to the financial powers and limitations set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) and notwithstanding the limitations set forth in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1), the district shall have the power to levy and cause to be collected an additional tax not to exceed one-tenth of a mill upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within those portions of Adams, Arapahoe, Denver, Douglas, and Jefferson counties lying within the district. The additional tax shall be collected in the manner set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c). The funds derived from such levy shall be used for the maintenance of and any improvements on that portion of the South Platte river which lies within the district.

To levy taxes for any fiscal year without limitation as to rate or amount for the payment of any debt of the district authorized at an election as provided in this article, except as otherwise provided by sections 32-11-564 and 32-11-566, in accordance with section 32-11-533, and evidenced by the district's interim debentures, bonds, or other contract constituting a general obligation of the district, for a term exceeding one year, and between the district and the federal government or any public body (or any combination thereof), as provided in this section, but otherwise to levy taxes for any fiscal year subject to the following limitations:

To fix, from time to time increase or decrease, collect, and cause to be collected rates, fees, and other service charges pertaining to the facilities of the district, including without limitation minimum charges and charges for availability of the facilities or services relating thereto; to pledge such revenues for the payment of district securities; and to enforce the collection of such revenues by civil action or by any other means provided by law;

To levy, collect, and cause to be collected assessments fixed against specially benefited real property in any improvement district within the urban district as provided in this article;

To deposit any moneys of the district in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S.;

To invest and reinvest any surplus money in the district's treasury, including such moneys in a sinking or reserve fund established for the purpose of retiring any district securities, not required for the immediate necessities of the district in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., by direct purchase of any issue of such securities, or part thereof, at the original sale of the same, or by the subsequent purchase of such securities, except as otherwise provided in section 32-11-520 or elsewhere in this article;

To redeem at maturity and to sell from time to time such securities thus purchased and held, so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which such securities were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district;

To reinvest the proceeds of any such sale in securities as provided in paragraph (h) of this subsection (1) and otherwise in this article.

Purpose of levy

Mill limitation

To defray operation and maintenance expenses:
one-half mill
To defray costs of capital improvements:
one mill
To accumulate funds as additional security
for payment of assessment bonds:
one mill
Maximum annual nondebt levy:
two and one-half mills;

Source:

L. 69:

p. 751, § 22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-22.

L. 70:

p. 298, § 118.

L. 71:

p. 964, § 13.

L. 73:

p. 996, § 1.

L. 79:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1210, § 3, effective July 1; (1)(g) amended, p. 1626, § 45, effective June 8.

L. 83:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1285, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 84:

(1)(c) amended, p. 846, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(c)(I) amended and (1)(c)(I.5) added, p. 1071, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 87:

(1)(c)(I) amended, p. 1407, § 5, effective April 22.

L. 89:

(1)(h) and (1)(j) amended, p. 1121, § 44, effective July 1.